apertium-sah.sah.lexc
LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

!  aor    neg.aor
!----------------
! A>bIn   BAp>pIn
! A>GIn   BAk>kIn
! Ar      BAt
! A>bIt   BAp>pIt
! A>GIt   BAk>kIt
! Al>lAr  BAt>tAr

! TODO: Stem-final vowels merge with the initial suffix vowel into {I}

%<aor%>:%>%{A%}%{р%} V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т V-PERS-S1 ; 

%<past%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т V-PERS-S1 ;              ! "прошедшее результативное / past resultative" (at some point)
%<neg%>%<past%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т%{A%}х V-PERS-S1 ; ! "прошедшее результативное / past resultative" (at some point)

%<plu%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т V-PERS-S2 ;              ! "преждепрошедшее повествовательное / pluperfect narrative" (specific time)
%<neg%>%<plu%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т%{A%}х V-PERS-S2 ; ! "преждепрошедшее повествовательное / pluperfect narrative" (specific time)

%<pii%>:%>%{A%}%{Р%}% эт V-PERS-S2 ; ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<pii%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т% эт V-PERS-S2 ;  ! Dir/LR

%<pii%>:%>%{A%}%{Р%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<neg%>%<pii%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т V-PERS-S2 ; 

!%<pros%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}%{G%} V-PERS-S2 ; ! FIXME: check
!  -IAG суоҕа (-ыа(х)-P2 суоҕа) 

%<epis%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}тт%{A%}%{A%}х V-PERS-S1 ; ! FIXME: check

%<aor%>%<nec%>:%>%{A%}р%>д%{A%}%{A%}х V-PERS-S1 ;

%<fut%>%<nec%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}х%>т%{A%}%{A%}х V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<nec%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}% суох%>т%{A%}%{A%}х V-PERS-S1 ;

%<aor%>%<nec%>%<irre%>:%>%{A%}р%>д%{A%}%{A%}х% эт V-PERS-S2 ;
%<fut%>%<nec%>%<irre%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}х%>т%{A%}%{A%}х% эт V-PERS-S2 ;

! %<resl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т V-PERS-S1 ; ! FIXME: check
! %<neg%>%<resl%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т%{A%}х V-PERS-S1 ; ! FIXME: check -S1 or -S2 ?

%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т% эбит V-PERS-S1 ; ! found out
%<past%>%<ded%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}х V-PERS-S2 ; ! like guessing

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}х V-PERS-S2 ; ! future
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{I%}%{A%} V-PERS-NEGFUT ; ! future

%<unac%>:%>%{A%}% илик V-PERS-S1 ; ! unaccomplished

%<hab%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}чч%{I%} V-PERS-S1 ; ! habitual

%<abes%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}кк%{A%} V-PERS-S1 ; ! abessive

%<cert%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}н%{A%} V-PERS-S1 ; ! for expressing certainty in statement

%<pot%>:%>%{I%}%{I%}һ%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;  ! for expressing "an action that may be realized, which the speaker affirms with a definite measure of certainty" (https://www.jehsmith.com/1/2021/03/verbal-mood-in-sakha-a-comprehensive-analysis.html)
%<neg%>%<pot%>:%>%{I%}м%>%{I%}%{I%}һ%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<neg%>%<pot%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}% суох V-PERS-S2 ;  ! Dir/LR

%<poss%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}й%{A%} V-PERS-S1-P12 ;  ! "perhaps will happen"
%<poss%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р%{A%}й V-PERS-S1-P3 ;

%<neg%>%<poss%>:%>%{I%}м%>%{A%}%{A%}й%{A%} V-PERS-S1-P12 ;
%<neg%>%<poss%>:%>%{I%}м%>%{A%}%{A%}р%{A%}й V-PERS-S1-P3 ;



LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<gna_cond%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
!%<gna_cond2%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}х V-PERS-COND2 ; ! FIXME: check, rename  ! probably not right, see #5
!
!%<ger_cond2%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}х GER-SUBST ;
%<ger_cond%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}х GER-SUBST ;


LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<prc_aor%>:%>%{A%}%{р%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; !FIXME:check

! Ыллыыр чыычаах "a singing bird"
%<gpr_aor%>:%>%{A%}%{р%} # ; !FIXME:check
%<neg%>%<gpr_aor%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т # ; 

%<prc_impf%>:%>%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME: check
%<neg%>%<prc_impf%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}н%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gna_impf%>:%>%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME: check
%<neg%>%<gna_impf%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}н%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gna_perf%>:%>%{a%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME: check
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}н%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{a%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME: check
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}н%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gna_abes%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}кк%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME: check
%<gna_caus%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}чч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME: check

! FIXME: could be prc_plan as well
!   see https://github.com/apertium/apertium-sah/issues/5#issuecomment-560482709
%<gna_plan%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! "in order to"
%<gna_plan%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р%{I%} V-PERS-S1 ; ! "in order to"

%<gna_suc%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}т CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! "successive" (for lack of a better name; English is "right after doing")
%<neg%>%<gna_suc%>:%>%{I%}м%>%{A%}%{A%}т CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! "successive" (for lack of a better name; English is "right after doing")

%<gpr_unac%>:%>%{A%}% илик CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! unaccomplished

%<ger_aor%>:%>%{A%}р GER-SUBST ; 
%<neg%>%<ger_aor%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т GER-SUBST ; 

%<ger_irre%>%<nom%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}н # ;                        ! FIXME: rename
%<neg%>%<ger_irre%>%<nom%>:%>%{m%}%{i%}м%>%{I%}%{A%}н # ;

%<ger%>:%>%{H%}%{I%}%{Н%} GER-SUBST ;       ! FIXME: check

%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}х # ;

%<ger_past%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т GER-SUBST ; !
%<neg%>%<ger_past%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т%{A%}х GER-SUBST ; !

%<gpr_past%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т CLITICS-NO-COP ; !
%<neg%>%<gpr_past%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т%{A%}х CLITICS-NO-COP ; !

%<ger_pot%>:%>%{I%}%{A%} GER-SUBST-NOM ;
%<neg%>%<ger_pot%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}% суох GER-SUBST ;

%<ger_fut%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}х GER-SUBST ; !
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{I%}м%>%{I%}%{A%}х GER-SUBST ; !


%<ger_hab%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}чч%{I%} GER-SUBST ;

%<ger_nec%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}х%>т%{A%}%{A%}х GER-SUBST ;

%<ger_unac%>:%>%{A%}% илик GER-SUBST ; ! unaccomplished


!! Incorrect(?) non-finite verb forms:

!%<ger_pros%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}х SUBST ; 

!%<gna_fut%>:%>%{I%}%{A%}х CLITICS-NO-COP ; !

!!!! FIXME: NEW STUFF TO CHECK
!%<gna_fut%>:%>%{I%}%{A%} # ;
!%<prc_fut%>:%>%{I%}%{A%} # ;

! Apparently not gna
! %<gna_past%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т CLITICS-NO-COP ; !
! %<neg%>%<gna_past%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}т%{A%}х CLITICS-NO-COP ; !



LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;


V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

! Imperatives
V-IMP ;


LEXICON V-DER 

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}с V-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-PASS

%<pass%>:%>%{i%}л%{y%}н%{ы%} V-COMMON ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}л%{y%}н%{ы%} V-DER ;


LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-PASS ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-AUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ;

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<subst%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON ADV-DIK
! Adverb derived with -DIK

%<adv%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON POST 

%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;


LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND 

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD

%<mod%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ; 


LEXICON ABBR-INIT

%<abbr%>: # ;

%<abbr%>%+А%.:А%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Б%.:Б%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+В%.:В%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Г%.:Г%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Д%.:Д%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Е%.:Е%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ж%.:Ж%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+З%.:З%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+И%.:И%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+К%.:К%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Л%.:Л%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+М%.:М%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Н%.:Н%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+О%.:О%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+П%.:П%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Р%.:Р%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+С%.:С%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Т%.:Т%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+У%.:У%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ф%.:Ф%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Х%.:Х%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ш%.:Ш%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Э%.:Э%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ю%.:Ю%. ABBR ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Я%.:Я%. ABBR ; ! ""

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous

дуо%<qst%>:дуо # ; 
дуу%<qst%>:дуу # ; ! FIXME:Check

ини%<mod_ass%>:ини # ;
дии%<mod_ass%>:дии # ; ! "ведь, же"
ээ%<mod_ass%>:ээ # ;
бэл%<mod_ass%>:бэл # ; ! "даже"

бастакынан%<mod%>:бастакынан # ; ! "во-первых" - check

LEXICON Postpositions
иннинэ:иннинэ POST ; ! "до, перед"
кытары:кытары POST ; ! "вместе с, совместно с; вплоть до..., включая и..."
кэннигэр:кэннигэр POST ; ! ""
диэки:диэки POST ; ! "к, в сторону"
супту:супту POST ; ! ""
аатыттан:аатыттан POST ; ! ""
ахсынан:ахсынан POST ; ! ""
быһыынан:быһыынан POST ; ! ""
инниттэн:инниттэн POST ; ! ""
кэтэҕинэн:кэтэҕинэн POST ; ! ""
ортотуттан:ортотуттан POST ; ! ""
утаатыгар:утаатыгар POST ; ! ""
LEXICON Modals
бара%-кэлэ% сатаан:бара%-кэлэ% сатаан MOD ; ! ""
бука% баһаалыста:бука% баһаалыста MOD ; ! ""
быһатыта:быһатыта MOD ; ! ""
дьиҥинэн% буолаҕына:дьиҥинэн% буолаҕына MOD ; ! ""
дьэ% сөп:дьэ% сөп MOD ; ! ""
ити% эрээри:ити% эрээри MOD ; ! ""
кырата:кырата MOD ; ! ""
мэ:мэ MOD ; ! ""
сэк% курдук:сэк% курдук MOD ; ! ""
тугу% гынаары:тугу% гынаары MOD ; ! ""
оннугун% оннук:оннугун% оннук MOD ; ! ""
өссө:өссө MOD ; ! ""
LEXICON Adverbs 
соҕус:соҕус POSTADV ; ! "enough (?)"
ханна:ханна ADV-ITG ; ! "где"
тоҕо:тоҕо ADV-ITG ; ! "почему"
хайдах:хайдах ADV-ITG ; ! "как"
хантан:хантан ADV-ITG ; ! "откуда"
бүгүн:бүгүн ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "сегодня"
сарсын:сарсын ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "завтра"
быйыл:быйыл ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "этот год, в этом году"
былырыын:былырыын ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "прошлой год, в прошлом году"
бөлүүн:бөлүүн ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "этой ночью"
үчүгэйдик:үчүгэйдик ADV-DIK ; ! "хорошо"
киэҥник:киэҥник ADV-DIK ; ! "широко"
үгүстүк:үгүстүк ADV-DIK ; ! "много"
куһаҕаннык:куһаҕаннык ADV-DIK ; ! "плохо"
болҕомтолоохтук:болҕомтолоохтук ADV-DIK ; ! "внимательно; attentively"
ахсарбаттык:ахсарбаттык ADV ; ! "с оттенком пренебрежения"
килэдиччи:килэдиччи ADV ; ! "так, чтобы заблестело"
мадьаччы:мадьаччы ADV ; ! "криво"
сэмээр:сэмээр ADV ; ! "послушно"
хачыгыраччы:хачыгыраччы ADV ; ! "с легким треском"
кириэстии:кириэстии ADV ; ! ""
бокуччу:бокуччу ADV ;
дьалбарыччы:дьалбарыччы ADV ;
кылыбыраччы:кылыбыраччы ADV ;
мөккүөрдээхтик:мөккүөрдээхтик ADV ;
сэһигирэччи:сэһигирэччи ADV ;
хабырдык:хабырдык ADV ;
LEXICON Verbs
эр:эр V-AUX ; ! ""
сыт:сыт V-AUX ; ! "do something for a moment"
эт:эт V-AUX ; ! ""
кэбис:кэбис V-AUX ; ! "в сочет. с деепр. на =ан основного гл. выступает в роли вспомогательного гл. и служит для образования законченного вида: сиэн кэбис = съесть (до конца);"
сыс:сыс V-AUX ; ! "в сочет. с деепр. на =а, =ыы употр. как служебное сл. со знач. чуть, едва; охто сыстым я чуть не упал; бара сыста он едва не ушёл"
биэр V-AUX ; ! used with prc_perf for cessative
көннөр:көннөр V-TV ; ! "побуд. от көн= 1) делать прямым; 2) перен. делать лучше"
убаастан:убаастан V-TV ; ! ""
аргыһахтаа:аргыһахтаа V-TV ;
буорай:буорай V-TV ;
даркылаа:даркылаа V-TV ;
күрүөтээ:күрүөтээ V-TV ;
мааллаа:мааллаа V-TV ;
саппыыскалас:саппыыскалас V-TV ;
сурулат:сурулат V-TV ;
сылтас:сылтас V-TV ;
туоллаҥнаа:туоллаҥнаа V-TV ;
уһаарбалаа:уһаарбалаа V-TV ;
ыйытылын:ыйытылын V-TV ;
абалаа:абалаа V-IV ;
дугуйдан:дугуйдан V-IV ;
киристиэбэлэс:киристиэбэлэс V-IV ;
күпсүлүт:күпсүлүт V-IV ;
ньаҕыллаҥнаа:ньаҕыллаҥнаа V-IV ;
сыдьаайталаа:сыдьаайталаа V-IV ;
тотурҕалан:тотурҕалан V-IV ;
халбарый:халбарый V-IV ;
эмэрий:эмэрий V-IV ;
куллугураа:куллугураа V-IV ; ! onomatopoetic
чалыардаа:чалыардаа V-IV ; ! onomatopoetic
кэкэлин:кэкэлин V-IV ; ! figurative
ыдьырый:ыдьырый V-IV ; ! figurative
LEXICON Interjections
айыбыын:айыбыын INTERJ ; ! "выражает опасение, опасливое удивление"
аай%-да:аай%-да INTERJ ; ! ""
айыытын% баҕаһын:айыытын% баҕаһын INTERJ ; ! ""
бэ:бэ INTERJ ; ! ""
маны% көр:маны% көр INTERJ ; ! ""
һи%-һи%-һи:һи%-һи%-һи INTERJ ; ! ""
туох% аатай% доҕор:туох% аатай% доҕор INTERJ ; ! ""
паапый:паапый INTERJ ; ! ""
эгэй:эгэй INTERJ ; ! ""
лаҥ:лаҥ INTERJ ; ! ""
лэп:лэп INTERJ ; ! ""
тор:тор INTERJ ; ! ""
LEXICON Abbreviations
ааҥл%.:англ%. ABBR ; ! "" ! Dir/LR ! Err/Orth
эбэҥк%.:эбэҥк%. ABBR ; ! ""
кыт%.:кыт%. ABBR ; ! ""
см²:см² ABBR ; ! "cm"
км³:км3 ABBR ; ! "km³" Dir/LR
мм²:мм2 ABBR ; ! "mm²" Dir/LR
солк%.:солк%. ABBR ; ! "руб."
уо%.д%.а%.:уо% д%.% а%. ABBR ; ! ""
ССКП:ССКП ABBR ; ! "КПСС" - NP-ORG-ABBR?
ТВ:ТВ ABBR ; ! ""
АЭС:АЭС ABBR ; ! ""
ЦК:ЦК ABBR ; ! ""
Б%.:Б%. ABBR-INIT ; 
В%.:В%. ABBR-INIT ; 
Д%.:Д%. ABBR-INIT ; 
Ж%.:Ж%. ABBR-INIT ; 
И%.:И%. ABBR-INIT ; 
Л%.:Л%. ABBR-INIT ; 
Н%.:Н%. ABBR-INIT ; 
П%.:П%. ABBR-INIT ; 
С%.:С%. ABBR-INIT ; 
У%.:У%. ABBR-INIT ; 
Х%.:Х%. ABBR-INIT ; 
Э%.:Э%. ABBR-INIT ; 
Я%.:Я%. ABBR-INIT ; 
